en: DJ equipment features: AI-powered; Beat sync; Booth output; Built-in mixer; Crossfader; DVS support; EQ controls; Fader control; Jog wheels; Looping function; MIDI control; Microphone input; Performance pads; Portable; Sampler; Sequencer; Standalone operation; Timecode control; Touch strips; Vinyl mode; Other
it: Funzionalità dell'attrezzatura per DJ: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Sincronizzazione del ritmo; Uscita cabina; Mixer incorporato; Crossfader; Supporto DVS; Controlli EQ; Controllo della dissolvenza; Rotelle; Funzione di looping; Controller MIDI; Input per microfono; Imbottitura performante; Portatile; Campionatore; Sequenziatore; Funzionamento autonomo; Controllo del codice temporale; Strisce tattili; Modalità vinile; Altro
tr: DJ ekipmanı özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Beat sync; kabin çıkışı; Dahili mixer; Crossfader; DVS desteği; EQ kontrolleri; Fader kontrolü; Jog tekerlekleri; Döngü fonksiyonu; MIDI kontrolü; Mikrofon girişi; Performans pedleri; Taşınabilir; Örnekleyici; Sıralayıcı; Bağımsız çalışma; Zaman kodu kontrolü; Dokunmatik şeritler; Vinil modu; Diğer
hu: A DJ-felszerelés jellemzői: AI-alapú; Beat Sync; Booth kimenet; Beépített keverő; Crossfader; DVS-támogatás; EQ-vezérlők; Fader-szabályozás; Tárcsák; Looping funkció; MIDI-vezérlés; Mikrofonbemenet; Teljesítményválasztók; Hordozható; Sampler; Szekvenátor; Önálló működés; Időkódvezérlés; Érintőszalagok; Vinyl üzemmód; Egyéb
ru: Характеристики диджейского оборудования: На базе ИИ; Синхронизация ритма; Выход для пульта управления; Встроенный микшер; Кроссфейдер; Поддержка DVS; Управление эквалайзером; Управление фейдером; Колеса прокрутки; Функция зацикливания; Управление MIDI; Вход для микрофона; Пэды для исполнения; Портативный; Сэмплер; Секвенсор; Автономная работа; Контроль таймкода; Сенсорные полоски; Режим винила; Другой
sk-SK: Funkcie DJ zariadenia: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; synchronizácia Beat Sync; Výstup odposluchu z mixážneho pultu; Vstavaný mixážny pult; Crossfader; Podpora DVS; Ovládanie EQ; Ovládanie stlmovača; Kolieska Jog; Funkcia slučkovania; MIDI ovládanie; Vstup pre mikrofón; Výkonové podložky; Prenosný; Vzorkovač; Sekvenátor; Samostatná prevádzka; Ovládanie časového kódu; Dotykové ovládacie pásiky; Vinylový režim; Iné
th: คุณลักษณะอุปกรณ์ดีเจ: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; การซิงค์จังหวะ; เอาต์พุตช่องบูธ; มีมิกเซอร์ในตัว; Crossfader; รองรับ DVS; ตัวควบคุม EQ; ตัวควบคุมการเฟด; จานหมุน; ฟังก์ชันการวนรอบ; การควบคุม MIDI; อินพุตไมโครโฟน; แผ่นเพอร์ฟอแมนซ์; แบบพกพา; แซมเพลอร์; ซีเควนเซอร์; การทำงานแบบสแตนด์อโลน; การควบคุมรหัสเวลา; แถบสัมผัส; โหมดแผ่นเสียง; อื่นๆ
nb: DJ-utstyrsfunksjoner: KI-drevet; Beat-synkronisering; Bodutgang; Innebygd blander; Crossfader; DVS-støtte; EQ-kontroller; Fader-kontroll; Jog wheels; Løkkefunksjon; MIDI-kontroll; Mikrofoninngang; Ytelsesputer; Bærbar; Sampler; Sekvenser; Frittstående drift; Tidskodekontroll; Berøringsstrimler; Vinylmodus; Annen
pt-PT: Características de equipamento de DJ: Alimentado por IA; Sincronização de batida; Saída da cabine; Misturador integrado; Crossfader; Suporte DVS; Controles de EQ; Controle de fader; Rodas de corrida; Função de loop; Controlo MIDI; Entrada de microfone; Almofadas de desempenho; Portáteis; Sampler; Sequenciador; Operação independente; Controlo de código de tempo; Tiras de toque; Modo vinil; Outro
ja: DJ機器の特徴: AI搭載; ビートシンク; ブース出力; ビルトインミキサー; クロスフェーダー; DVSサポート; EQコントロール; フェーダーコントロール; ジョグホイール; ループ機能; MIDIコントロール; マイク入力; パフォーマンスパッド; ポータブル; サンプラー; シーケンス制御装置; スタンドアロン式; タイムコード制御; タッチストリップ; ビニールモード; その他
lt-LT: Didžėjaus įrangos ypatybės: Veikia DI pagrindu; Dūžių sinchronizavimas; Kabinos išvestis; Integruotas garso maišytuvas; „Crossfader“; DVS palaikymas; EQ valdikliai; Garso išnykimo kontrolė; Valdymo ratukai; Uždaros kilpos funkcija; MIDI valdiklis; Mikrofono įvestis; Pasirodymo mygtukai; Nešiojama; Sempleris; Sekvenceris; Automatinis veikimas; Laiko kodų valdymas; Jutiklinės juostelės; Plokštelių režimas; Kita
vi: Tính năng thiết bị DJ: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Đồng bộ nhịp; Đầu ra booth; Có bàn mix; Crossfader; Hỗ trợ đọc đĩa than kỹ thuật số; Điều khiển EQ; Điều khiển fader; Mâm xoay; Chức năng lặp; Điều khiển MIDI; Đầu vào micrô; Performance pad; Xách tay; Lấy mẫu; Sequencer; Hoạt động độc lập; Kiểm soát mã thời gian; Dải cảm ứng; Chế độ vinyl; Khác
zh-CN: DJ 设备特点: AI 赋能; 节拍同步; Booth 输出; 内置混音器; 交叉推子; 支持 DVS; 均衡器控制; 音量控制; 转轮; 循环功能; MIDI 控制; 麦克风输入; 表演鼓垫; 便携式; 采样器; 音序器; 独立操作; 时间码控制; 触控带; 黑胶模式; 其他
sv: Detaljer för DJ-utrustning: AI-driven; Beat sync; Booth utgång; Inbyggd blandare; Crossfader; DVS-stöd; EQ-kontroller; Faderkontroll; Joghjul; Looping-funktion; MIDI-kontroll; Mikrofoningång; Prestandapads; Bärbar; Sampler; Sekvenserare; Fristående drift; Tidskodskontroll; Touch-remsor; Vinylläge; Annat
ro-RO: Caracteristici echipament DJ: Pe bază de AI; Sincronizarea ritmului; Ieșire cabină; Mixer integrat; Crossfader; Suport DVS; Comenzi EQ; Fader control; Roți jog; Funcția de redare repetată; Control MIDI; Intrare microfon; Performance pad-uri; Portabil; Sampler; Sequencer; Funcționare independentă; Controlul codului de timp; Touch strips; Modul vinil; Altele
ko: DJ 장비 기능: AI 기반; 비트 싱크; 부스 출력; 내장 믹서; 크로스페이더; DVS 지원; EQ 조절; 페이더 제어; 조그 휠; 루핑 기능; MIDI 컨트롤; 마이크 입력; 퍼포먼스 패드; 이동식; 샘플러; 시퀀서; 독립형 작동; 타임코드 제어; 터치 스트립; 비닐 모드; 기타
pt-BR: Recursos do equipamento de DJ: Com IA; Sincronização de batida; Saída da cabine; Mixer integrado; Crossfader; Suporte DVS; Controles de equalização; Controle de fader; Rodas de corrida; Função de loop; Controladores MIDI; Entrada do microfone; Almofadas de desempenho; Portátil; Sampler; Sequenciador; Operação autônoma; Controle de registro de data e hora; Tiras de toque; Modo vinil; Outro
cs: Vlastnosti DJ vybavení: S umělou inteligencí; Synchronizace rytmu; Výstup z kabiny; Vestavěný mixér; Crossfader; Podpora DVS; Ovládací prvky ekvalizéru; Ovládání faderů; Jog wheels; Funkce smyčky; Ovládání MIDI; Vstup pro mikrofon; Výkonné podložky; Přenosné; Sampler; Sekvencer; Samostatný provoz; Ovládání časového kódu; Dotykové proužky; Vinylový režim; Jiné
pl: Charakterystyka sprzętu DJ-skiego: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Synchronizacja rytmu; Wyjście booth; Wbudowany mikser; Crossfader; Obsługa DVS; Kontrole EQ; Sterowanie faderem; Koła impulsowe; Funkcja zapętlania; Sterowanie MIDI; Wejście mikrofonu; Podkładki podwyższające wydajność; Przenośny; Sampler; Sekwencer; Działanie autonomiczne; Kontrola kodu czasowego; Paski dotykowe; Tryb winylowy; Pozostałe
de: Funktionen der DJ-Ausrüstung: KI-gestützt; Beat-Sync; Booth-Ausgang; Eingebauter Mixer; Crossfader; DVS-Unterstützung; EQ-Steuerungen; Fader-Kontrolle; Jogwheels; Looping-Funktion; MIDI-Steuerung; Mikrofoneingang; Performance-Pads; Tragbar; Sampler; Sequenzer; Standalone-Betrieb; Timecode-Steuerung; Touch Strips; Vinylmodus; Sonstiges
fr: Caractéristiques de l’équipement de DJ: Doté d’une IA; Synchronisation des battements; Sortie booth; Mixeur intégré; Crossfader; Prise en charge DVS; Commandes d’égalisation; Contrôle des faders; Jogwheels; Fonction de boucle; Contrôle MIDI; Entrée micro; Pads de performance; Portable; Échantillonneur; Séquenceur; Fonctionnement autonome; Contrôle du timecode; Bandes tactiles; Mode vinyle; Autre
sl-SI: Funkcije DJ-opreme: Poganja UI; Sinhronizacija taktov; Izhod booth; Vgrajen mešalnik; Crossfader; Podpora DVS; Kontrole EQ; Nadzor faderja; Jog kolesa; Funkcija zanke; MIDI nadzor; Vhod za mikrofon; Pad blazinice; Prenosno; Vzorčevalnik; Sekvencer; Samostojno delovanje; Nadzor časovne kode; Drsnik na dotik; Vinilni način; Drugo
fi: DJ-laitteiden ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Beat sync; Osastolähtö; Sisäänrakennettu mikseri; Ristiinhäivytys; DVS-tuki; EQ-säätimet; Fader-ohjaus; Jog-pyörät; Silmukkatoiminto; MIDI-ohjaus; Mikrofonin sisääntulo; Suorituskykyiset palat; Siirrettävät; Näyteohjelmistot; Sekvensoija; Itsenäinen toiminta; Aikakoodin ohjaus; Kosketusnauhat; Vinyylitila; Muu
zh-TW: DJ 設備特點: AI 驅動; 節拍同步; 展位輸出; 內建混音器; 交叉漸變器; DVS 支援; 均衡器控制; 漸變控制; 單鍵飛梭; 循環功能; MIDI 控制; 麥克風輸入; 打擊墊; 可攜式; 取樣器; 音序器; 獨立運作; 時間碼控制; 觸控條; 乙烯基模式; 其他
hr-HR: Značajke DJ opreme: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Sinkronizacija takta; Izlaz kabine; Ugradbena mikseta; CrossFader; Podrška za DVS; EQ kontrole; Kontrola razine audiosignala; Kotačić za pomicanje; Funkcija ponavljanja; MIDI kontroleri; Ulaz za mikrofon; Jastučići za performanse; Prijenosno; Sampler; Sekvencer; Samostalni rad; Kontrola vremenskog koda; Dodirne trake; Način rada vinil; Ostalo
el: Χαρακτηριστικά εξοπλισμού DJ: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Συγχρονισμός παλμών; Έξοδος θαλάμου; Ενσωματωμένος μίκτης; Λειτουργία ομαλής μετάβασης μεταξύ των κομματιών; Υποστήριξη DVS; Έλεγχοι EQ; Έλεγχος εξισορροπητή; Μηχανοκίνητοι τροχοί; Λειτουργία βρόχων; Έλεγχος MIDI; Είσοδος μικροφώνου; Πλαίσια απόδοσης; Φορητό; Σάμπλερ; Αναπαραγωγέας αλληλουχίας; Αυτόνομη λειτουργία; Έλεγχος χρονομέτρου; Λωρίδες αφής; Λειτουργία βινυλίου; Άλλο
es: Características del equipo de DJ: Con tecnología de IA; Sincronización de ritmo; Salida de cabina; Mezclador incorporado; Fundido; Compatibilidad DVS; Controles de ecualizador; Control de atenuador; Ruedas de desplazamiento; Función de bucle; Controlador MIDI; Entrada de micrófono; Atenuadores de alto rendimiento; Portátil; Muestreador; Secuenciador; Funcionamiento autónomo; Control de código de tiempo; Tiras táctiles; Modo de vinilo; Otros
nl: Kenmerken DJ-apparatuur: AI-aangedreven; Beat-synchronisatie; Booth-uitgang; Ingebouwde mixer; Crossfader; DVS-ondersteuning; EQ-knoppen; Faderregeling; Jogwielen; Looping-functie; MIDI-besturing; Microfooningang; Prestatiematten; Draagbaar; Sampler; Sequencer; Zelfstandige werking; Tijdcodebesturing; Touchstrips; Vinyl-modus; Andere
bg-BG: Характеристики на DJ оборудване: Задвижван от AI; Синхронизиране на ритъма; Booth изход; Вграден миксер; Кросфейдър; Поддръжка на DVS; EQ контроли; Управление на фейдъра; Джог колела; Функция за зацикляне; MIDI управление; Вход за микрофон; Performance pads; Преносимо; Семплер; Секвенсер; Самостоятелна работа; Управление на таймкод; Сензорни ленти; Режим Винил; Други
da: Funktioner for DJ-udstyr: AI-drevet; Beat-synkronisering; Boot-output; Indbygget mixer; Crossfader; DVS-support; EQ-kontroller; Fader-kontrol; Jog-hjul; Looping-funktion; MIDI-kontrol; Mikrofonindgang; Ydeevnepuder; Transportabel; Sampler; Sequencer; Fritstående drift; Tidskodekontrol; Berøringsstrimler; Vinyltilstand; Andet